Illinois, session 104th, HB5349.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 5changing Section 5-100-1 as follows: 6    (625 ILCS 5/5-100-1)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 5-100-1)7    Sec. 5-100-1. Findings and Purpose. The The General 8Assembly finds that: (1) crimes involving the theft of 9vehicles and their parts have risen steadily over the past 10years, with a resulting loss of millions of dollars to the 11residents of this State; (2) essential to the criminal 12enterprise of vehicle theft operations is the ability of 13thieves to transfer or sell stolen vehicles or their parts 14through legitimate commercial channels, making them available 15for sale to the automotive industry; (3) vehicle dealers, 16scrap processors, automotive parts recyclers, repairers and 17rebuilders who comprise the vast majority of the persons 18engaged in the automotive business in this State are 19frequently exposed to pressures and influences from motor 20vehicle thieves; (4) elements of organized crime are 21constantly attempting to influence businessmen engaged in the 22sale and repair of motor vehicles so as to further their own 23criminal interests; and (5) close and strict government   HB5349- 2 -LRB104 19878 LNS 33328 b1regulation of vehicle dealers, scrap processors, automotive 2parts recyclers, repairers and rebuilders will provide a 3system of tracking the flow of vehicles and their essential 4parts and therefore significantly reduce the numbers of 5vehicle-related thefts in this State. It is, therefore, the 6intent of the General Assembly to establish a system of 7mandatory licensing and record keeping which will prevent or 8reduce the transfer or sale of stolen vehicles or their parts 9within this State.10    It further is the intent of the General Assembly that 11government agencies work in cooperation with vehicle dealers, 12scrap processors, automotive parts recyclers, repairers and 13rebuilders, utilizing their professional expertise in the 14development and execution of programs and strategies to reduce 15vehicle-related crime and maximize consumer protection while 16ensuring a healthy business climate for the legitimate 17automotive industry.18(Source: P.A. 85-572.)